test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_4st_id_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    uásálistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uásálistám
    uškijduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uškijdutám
    uđđâsistkevttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uđđâsistkiävtám
    vahaduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vahadutám
    vahaduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vahadut
    vahâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vahâgitám
    vajaskittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vajaskit
    vajoidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vajoiditám
    vardeškyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vardeškuáđám
    vicáristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vicáristám
    vierâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierâlitám
    vijsásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vijsásmitám
    virkosmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: virkosmitám
    visásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: visásmitám
    viäigudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viäigud
    viäisádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viäisáditám
    viälgudittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viälguditám
    vonâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vonâlistám
    vuoidâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuoidâl
    vuoidâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuoidâst
    vuoiŋâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuoiŋâst
    vuáháduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáhádutám
    vuáisádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáisád
    vuáivuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáivut
    vuálánittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuálánit
    vuástálistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuástálistám
    vyeijiliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vyeijil
    vyestilistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vyestilistám
    vájáldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vájálditám
    vájáldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vájáldit
    váldásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: váldásmitám
    vázzálittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vázzálitám
    vázáldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vázálditám
    väzzilistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: väzzilistám
    áimustittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: áimustitám
    ájánistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ájánistám
    ávugyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ávuguáđám
    ášáskuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ášáskut
    älkkeedittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: älkkeeditám
    älkkeedittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: älkkeedâđâm
    čagaldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čagalditám
    čagâlduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaŋâldut
    čalmettuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čalmettutám
    čavdesmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čavdesmitám
    čaŋaldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čaŋalditám
    šelgâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šelgâsmitám
    čergijdittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čergijditám
    čergijduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čergijdutám
    čergijduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čergijdut
    čielgâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čielgâsmitám
    činehuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: činehut
    šiälgásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šiälgásmitám
    čiäráidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiäráiditám
    čiäráidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiäráidit
    škuráhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: škuráhitám
    škuráidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: škuráiditám
    šliráhuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šliráhutám
    šnukkáristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šnukkáristám
    čokánistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čokánistám
    čoskijduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čoskijdutám
    čođâldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čođâlditám
    špiäiguttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: špiäigut
    špuákkárittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: špuákkáritám
    čuoigâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoigâd
    čuoigâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuoigâlitám
    čuoigâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoigâlit
    čuoigâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoigât
    čuojâldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuojâlditám
    čuomâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuomâstit
    čuožâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuožâstitám
    čuákkimistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuákkimistám
    šyeimidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šyeimid
    čájádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čájáditám
